Idaho, session 2025, H0319.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Title 74, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby amended
by the addition thereto of a NEW CHAPTER, to be known and designated as Chap-
ter 7, Title 74, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
CHAPTER 7
STATE EMPLOYEE LOYALTY
74-701. STATE EMPLOYEE LOYALTY. (1) A state employee shall not assist
any person or entity in any legal matter against the state of Idaho.
(2) As used in this chapter:
(a) "Assist" means acting as a paid or unpaid agent, consultant, ex-
pert, or attorney in any claim against the state of Idaho, receiving any
share of or interest in any such claim, or receiving any compensation or
gratuity in consideration of assistance in the pursuit of such claim.
(b) "Legal matter" means any:
(i) Litigation or any quasi-judicial proceeding;
(ii) Administrative hearing;
(iii) Alternative dispute resolution, including arbitration or
mediation; or
(iv) The development or resolution of legal claims or potential
legal claims, including through litigation, an administrative
hearing process, or alternative dispute resolution.
(c) "State employee" means a nonclassified state officer or employee
pursuant to chapter 16, title 59, Idaho Code, or a classified state em-
ployee pursuant to chapter 53, title 67, Idaho Code.
(3) The provisions of this chapter shall not apply to:
(a) Work performed by a state employee in the course of his duties as a
state employee; or
(b) Matters covered by section 6-2104, Idaho Code.
(4) Nothing in this chapter shall limit a state employee's rights with
respect to such employee's own claims against the state of Idaho.
(5) Nothing in this section shall prohibit an employee from serving as
a fact witness when properly served with a subpoena issued pursuant to an ap-
plicable statute, court rule, or administrative rule.
(6) The attorney general may bring a civil action against any person who
engages in conduct constituting a violation under this section upon proof of
such conduct by a preponderance of the evidence. A person who violates the
provisions of this section shall be subject to a civil penalty of not more


than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for each violation or the amount of com-
pensation that the person received while engaging in the prohibited conduct,
whichever is greater. The imposition of a civil penalty under this subsec-
tion shall not preclude any other criminal or civil statutory, common law, or
administrative remedy available under the law to the state or any other per-
son. A person found to have violated this section shall be terminated from
state employment.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after its
passage and approval.